apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="m/òriri__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>òriri</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>òriri</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>

    	<e><p><l>oru</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ori</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ori</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uremu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uriti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>òrinu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>orinu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ori</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urissi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uremu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uriti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>urìssiru</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>urissiru</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	
        <e><p><l>òri</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>urìssi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>urèmu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>urìti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>urìssiru</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urissi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uremu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uriti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>urissiru</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      
        
    	 <!-- Pretérito de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>orsi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>orsi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>orsi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>òrsimu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>orsimu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uriti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>òrinu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>orinu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        

    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>urìa</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uria</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urivi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urìa</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uria</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urìamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uriamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urìavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uriavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>urìanu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urianu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	 <!-- Two alternative forms: with "eva" and with "iva". Forms without accent accepted.  -->
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ureva</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uriva</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urevi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urivi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ureva</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uriva</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urèvamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urìvamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urèvavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urìvavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urèvanu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urìvanu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urevamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urivamu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urevavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urivavu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urevanu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urivanu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    	 <!-- Futuro Simple -->
    	<e><p><l>urirò</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urirrò</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urirai</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urirrai</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urirà</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urirrà</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uriremu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urirremu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uririti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>urirriti</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>urirannu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>urirrannu</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presente de Subjuntivo falta en Siciliano -->

    	 <!-- Pretérito de Subjuntivo -->
        <e><p><l>urissi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>urissi</l><r>òriri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="mòriri"><i>m</i><par n="m/òriri__vblex"/></e>
